Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 29 Volunteer Emergency Medical Technician Pension Fund

§ 35-29-101
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; 2009, ch. 169, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-102
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-103
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-104
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-105
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-106
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 107, § 3; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-107
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-108
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-109
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-110
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-111
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-29-112
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 122, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 32, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.